Utah statutes.
4-11-10.   Enforcement -- Inspections authorized -- Warrants.
The department and all county bee inspectors shall have access to all apiaries
or places where bees, hives, and appliances are kept for the purpose of
enforcing this chapter. If admittance is refused, the department, or the
county bee inspector involved, may proceed immediately to obtain an ex parte
warrant from the nearest court of competent jurisdiction to allow entry upon
the premises for the purpose of making an inspection.
